Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-162 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. On or before the school district start date, parents making
the decision to choose homeschooling, podschooling, or
microschooling shall submit a letter of intent to the State
Department of Education. The letter of intent shall include the
parent's or parents' names, the child's or children's names, the
home address, the names of any other individuals living within the
home, the names of any associated individuals or organizations
Req. No. 11778 Page 1

assi sting with the child's or children's schooling, and a brief
statement for the decision of schooling.
B. Any change to or from the decision to homeschool, podschool,
microschool, or change school districts, whether a result of a move
or otherwise, shall require a subsequent letter of intent containing
the information outlined in subsection A of this section.
C. The State Department of Education shall compile a database
of individuals, facilities, and organizations that perform and
assist with homeschooling, podschooling, or microschooling.
D. For purposes of this section:
1. "Microschool" means a school initiated by one or more
teachers or an entity created to operate a school that charges
tuition for the students who enroll and is an alternative to
enrolling in a public school, private school, homeschool, or
podschool; and
2. "Podschool" means a voluntary association of parents
choosing to group their children together to participate in their
elementary or secondary academic studies as an alternative to
enrolling in a public school, private school, homeschool, or
microschool, including participation in an activity or service
provided to the children in exchange for payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
Req. No. 11778 Page 2

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11778 SW 01/11/25




















Req. No. 11778 Page 3